Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Contributions.
Sec. 23.20.276.
Financing benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations; election.

Benefits paid to employees of nonprofit organizations shall be financed in accordance with the provisions of this section and AS

23.20.277

. For the purposes of this section and AS

23.20.277

, a nonprofit organization is an organization, or group of organizations, described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) and exempt from income tax under 26 U.S.C. 501(a).

A nonprofit organization described in this section that, under AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

, is, or becomes, subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under the provisions of AS

23.20.165

, unless it elects, in accordance with this section, to pay to the department for the unemployment compensation fund an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and of one-half of the extended benefits paid, that is attributable to service in the employ of the nonprofit organization, to individuals for weeks of unemployment that begin during the effective period of the election.

A nonprofit organization which is, or becomes, subject to this chapter on January 1, 1972, may elect to become liable for payments in place of contributions for a period of not less than one taxable year beginning with January 1, 1972, if it files with the department a written notice of its election within the 30-day period immediately following January 1, 1972, or within a like period immediately following the date of enactment of this subsection, whichever occurs later.

A nonprofit organization which becomes subject to this chapter after January 1, 1972, may elect to become liable for payments in place of contributions for a period of not less than 12 months beginning with the date on which this subjection begins by filing a written notice of its election with the department not later than 30 days immediately following the date of the determination of the subjection.

A nonprofit organization which makes an election in accordance with (c) or (d) of this section will continue to be liable for payments in place of contributions until it files with the department a written notice terminating its election. The notice must be filed not later than 30 days before the beginning of the taxable year for which the termination will first be effective.

A nonprofit organization which has been paying contributions under this chapter for a period after January 1, 1972, may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the department not later than 30 days before the beginning of any taxable year a written notice of election to become liable for payments in place of contributions. This election is not terminable by the organization for that and the next taxable year.

The department may for good cause extend the period within which a notice of election or a notice of termination must be filed and may permit an election to be retroactive in effect but not any earlier than with respect to benefits paid after December 31, 1971.

The department, in accordance with regulations it adopts, shall notify each nonprofit organization of any determination which it may make of its status as an employer and of the effective date of any election which it makes and of any termination of election. These determinations are subject to reconsideration, appeal, and review in accordance with the provisions of AS

23.20.410

—

23.20.470

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 33 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b) substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(6)

”, deleted “on or after January 1, 1972,” following “subject to this chapter”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 23.20.277.
Reimbursement payments by nonprofit organizations, governmental entities, and federally recognized tribes.

Payments in place of contributions by nonprofit organizations shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this section including either (b) or (c) of this section.

At the end of each calendar quarter, or at the end of any other period as determined by the department, the department shall bill each government entity, federally recognized tribe, nonprofit organization, or group of nonprofit organizations that has elected to make payments in place of contributions, for benefits paid during the quarter or other prescribed period that are attributable to service in the employ of the government entity, federally recognized tribe, nonprofit organization, or group. In the case of nonprofit organizations and groups of nonprofit organizations, the amount billed is an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits plus extended benefits that are not reimbursable by the federal government. In the case of a government entity or federally recognized tribe, the amount billed is an amount equal to the full amount of the regular benefits plus the full amount of the extended benefits paid.

Each nonprofit organization that has elected payments in place of contributions may request permission to make payments as provided in this subsection. This method of payment becomes effective upon approval by the department. At the end of each calendar quarter or at the end of any other period as determined by the department, the department shall bill each nonprofit organization for an amount representing one of the following:

that percentage of its total payroll for the immediately preceding calendar year as the department determines; the determination shall be based each year on the average benefit costs attributable to service in the employ of nonprofit organizations during the preceding calendar year;

for any organization that did not pay wages throughout the four calendar quarters of the preceding calendar year, that percentage of its payroll during the year as the department determines.

At the end of each taxable year, the department may modify the quarterly percentage of payroll thereafter payable by the nonprofit organization in order to minimize excess or insufficient payments.

At the end of each taxable year, the department shall determine whether the total of payments for the year made by a nonprofit organization or group of nonprofit organizations is less than, or in excess of, the total amount of regular benefits plus extended benefits not reimbursable by the federal government paid to individuals during the taxable year based on wages attributable to service in the employ of the nonprofit organization or group. In the case of a government entity or federally recognized tribe that has elected to make payments under this section, the department shall determine whether the total of payments for the year is less than, or in excess of, the total amount of regular benefits plus the total amount of extended benefits as determined in this subsection. If total payments for the taxable year are less than the amount so determined, the employer is liable for payment of the unpaid balance to the fund in accordance with (f) of this section. If the total payments exceed the amount so determined for the taxable year, all or part of the excess may, at the discretion of the department, be refunded from the fund or retained in the fund as part of the payments that may be required for the next taxable year.

Payment of any bill rendered under (b) or (c) of this section shall be made not later than 30 days after the bill was mailed to the last known address of the nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe or was otherwise delivered to it, unless there has been an application for review and redetermination in accordance with (h) of this section.

Payments made by any nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe under the provisions of this section may not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of an individual in the employ of the organization, group of organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe; nor may contributions be required of an employee on the basis of wages paid to that employee for services performed by the employee in employment for a nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe that makes an election to become liable for payments in place of contributions under AS

23.20.276

—

23.20.278

, and the wages are paid during the period of election.

The amount due, specified in a bill from the department, is conclusive on the employer unless, not later than 30 days after the bill was mailed to its last address of record or otherwise delivered to it, the employer files an application for redetermination by the department, setting out the grounds for the application. The department shall promptly review and reconsider the bill and shall issue a redetermination in any case in which an application for redetermination has been filed. Any redetermination is conclusive on the employer unless, not later than 30 days after the redetermination was mailed to its last address of record or otherwise delivered to it, the employer files an appeal to the commissioner, setting out the grounds for the appeal. Proceedings on appeal to the commissioner from the amount of a bill rendered under this subsection or a redetermination of the amount shall be in accordance with AS

23.20.410

—

23.20.470

.

Past due payments of amounts in place of contributions are subject to the same interest and penalties that, under AS

23.20.185

—

23.20.195

, apply to past due contributions.

At the discretion of the department, a nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe that elects to become liable for payments in place of contributions under AS

23.20.276

—

23.20.278

is required, within 30 days after the effective date of its election, to execute and file with the department a surety bond approved by the department or it may elect instead to deposit with the department money or securities. The amount of the bond or deposit shall be determined by the department in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

If a nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe is delinquent in making payments in place of contributions as required under this section and after having been given notice, the department, after giving notice to the employer who is delinquent, shall terminate that employer’s election to make payments in place of contributions until a time provided by regulations adopted by the department.

Each employer that is liable for payments in place of contributions shall pay to the department for the fund the amount of regular benefits plus the extended benefits not reimbursable by the federal government paid to individuals that are attributable to service in the employ of that employer. However, a government entity or federally recognized tribe that has elected to make payments under this section is liable for the amount of regular benefits plus the full amount of extended benefits that are attributable to service in the employ of that entity or tribe. If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by more than one employer and one or more of these employers is liable for payments in place of contributions, the amount payable to the fund by each employer that is liable for payments shall be determined by the department in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

The department may not approve an election to make payments in place of contributions if, at the time of the election, a nonprofit organization, group of nonprofit organizations, government entity, or federally recognized tribe is delinquent in making contributions under AS

23.20.165

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 122 SLA 1977; am §§ 28, 29 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 43 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 10 ch 27 SLA 2009; am § 34 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the amendments to this section made by §§ 2 — 10, ch. 27, SLA 2009, see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, added “federally recognized tribe” or similar, “group of nonprofit organizations”, and “government entity” throughout the section; in subsections (g) and (j), substituted “AS

23.20.276

—

23.20.278

” for “AS

23.20.276

” following “in place of contributions under”; in subsection (h), substituted “employer” for “organization” four times; in subsection (k), substituted “and after having been given notice, the department, after giving notice to the employer who is delinquent, shall terminate that employer’s election to make payments in place of contributions until a time provided by regulations adopted by the department” for “the department may terminate that organization’s election to make payments in place of contributions as of the beginning of the next taxable year, and the termination is effective for that and the next taxable year”; added subsection (m); and made related stylistic changes.

The second 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (c), deleted (c)(1), which read, “for 1972, .25 percent of its total payroll for 1971;”, redesignated (c)(2) as (c)(1) and (c)(3) as (c)(2), and, in (c)(1), deleted the introductory language, “for years after 1972,”; made a stylistic change.

Sec. 23.20.278.
Financing benefits paid to employees of the state, political subdivisions of the state, or a federally recognized tribe.

A federally recognized tribe, a political subdivision, or a department, division, or other agency of the state subject to this chapter, under AS

23.20.525(a)(12)

, shall pay contributions under the provisions of AS

23.20.165

, unless it elects to reimburse the department for the unemployment compensation fund according to the provisions applicable to nonprofit organizations, government entities, or federally recognized tribes under AS

23.20.276

and

23.20.277

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 11 ch 27 SLA 2009; am § 35 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

The contingent amendment to this section made under sec. 33, ch. 122, SLA 1977 never took effect and was repealed by sec. 82, ch. 41, SLA 2009.

In 2009, to reconcile the amendments made by § 11,
ch. 27, SLA 2009 and §§ 35 and 38,
ch. 41, SLA 2009, a reference to “
AS

23.20.525(a)(12)

” was used instead of “
AS

23.20.525(a)(14)

”.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the 2009 amendment of this section, see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, substituted “political subdivisions of the state, or a federally recognized tribe” for “and its political subdivisions” in the catchline; added “federally recognized tribe, a” at the beginning; substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(14)

” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

and (14)” following “subject to this chapter, under”; and added “, government entities, or federally recognized tribes” following “applicable to nonprofit organizations”.

The second 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “AS

23.20.525(a)(12)

” for “AS

23.20.525(a)(4)

and (14)” preceding “shall pay contributions”.

Sec. 23.20.279.
Prohibition on relief of certain charges to an employer’s account.

An employer’s account may not be relieved of charges relating to a payment that was made erroneously from the unemployment trust fund account (AS

23.20.135(a)

) if the department determines that

the erroneous payment was made because the employer or an agent of the employer was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to a documented request from the department for information relating to the claim for unemployment compensation; and

the employer or an agent of the employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to requests under (1) of this subsection.

In this section,

“erroneous payment” means a payment that, but for the failure by the employer or an agent of the employer with respect to the claim for unemployment compensation, would not have been made;

“pattern of failing” means repeated documented failure by the employer or the agent of the employer to respond, taking into consideration the number of instances of failure in relation to the total volume of requests; however, an employer or an agent of the employer that fails to respond as described in (a)(2) of this section may not be determined to have engaged in a pattern of failure if the number of failures during the year before the request is made is fewer than two or the percentage of failures is less than two percent.

History.

(§ 3 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 50, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 50, SLA 2013, this section applies to overpaid benefits established after October 21, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2013 (HB 76), see 2013 House Journal 70 — 71.